New York, session 2025-2026, S6803.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 396-cc of the general business law, as added by 2 chapter 556 of the laws of 1998, is renumbered section 396-ccc and a new 3 section 396-cccc is added to read as follows: 4 § 396-cccc. Discounted admission and memberships for disabled individ- 5 uals. 1. (a) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, 6 or agent or employee thereof, which offers, in the regular course of 7 business, an established senior citizen, student or veteran discount on 8 the price of admission or membership thereto, shall offer a discount on 9 the price of admission or membership to disabled individuals. 10 (b) The price of admission or membership for such disabled individual 11 discount shall be equal to the lowest discount price offered by such 12 person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or agent or 13 employee thereof to another category of individuals. 14 (c) An admission or membership purchased with a disabled individual 15 discount pursuant to this section shall include free admission for the 16 caregiver accompanying such disabled individual. If a disabled individ- 17 ual discounted admission or membership is available for purchase on the 18 website of a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or 19 agent or employee thereof, such website shall include an option to iden- 20 tify the caregiver of a disabled individual to receive the free admis- 21 sion pursuant to this paragraph. If a disabled individual discounted 22 admission or membership is available for purchase at the box office of a 23 person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or agent or 24 employee thereof, such box office shall conspicuously advertise an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03317-01-5 S. 6803 2 1 option to identify the caregiver of a disabled individual to receive the 2 free admission pursuant to this paragraph. 3 2. (a) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or 4 agent or employee thereof, which offers, in the regular course of busi- 5 ness, an established senior citizen, student, veteran or disabled indi- 6 vidual discount on the price of admission or membership thereto shall 7 conspicuously advertise the availability and price of such discount at 8 the box office and website of such person, firm, partnership, corpo- 9 ration, or association, or agent or employee thereof. The availability 10 and price of such discount shall also be conspicuously advertised on the 11 accessibility page of the website of such person, firm, partnership, 12 corporation, or association, or agent or employee thereof. 13 (b) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or 14 agent or employee thereof, which offers, in the regular course of busi- 15 ness, or utilizes a pay-as-you-wish policy on the price of admission or 16 membership thereto shall conspicuously advertise such policy at the box 17 office and website of such person, firm, partnership, corporation, or 18 association, or agent or employee thereof. Such policy shall also be 19 conspicuously advertised on the accessibility page of the website of 20 such person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association, or agent or 21 employee thereof. 22 3. As used in this section the following terms have the following 23 meanings: 24 (a) "Disabled individual" means a person with a disability, as defined 25 in subdivision twenty-one of section two hundred ninety-two of the exec- 26 utive law. 27 (b) "Caregiver" means the person who normally provides the daily care 28 or supervision of a disabled individual. 29 (c) "Pay-as-you-wish policy" means a pricing strategy where the buyer 30 determines what price such buyer will pay for a commodity. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 32 have become a law.